District of Columbia statutes.
31-2702

Applicability of chapter.

This chapter shall apply to all forms of fire, casualty, motor vehicle, explosion, sprinkler leakage, and inland marine insurance in the District and to all forms of insurance within the scope of Chapter 25 of this title; provided, that this chapter shall not apply to reinsurance other than joint reinsurance to the extent provided in this chapter, and shall not apply to:

(1)

Insurance of vessels or craft, their cargoes, marine builders’ risks, marine protection and indemnity, or other risks commonly insured under marine, as distinguished from inland marine, insurance policies;

(2)

Title insurance;

(3)

Accident and health insurance;

(4)

Insurance against loss of or damage to aircraft or to liability, other than workmen’s compensation and employers’ liability, arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of aircraft; and

(5)

To insurance issued to self-insurers and insuring against loss in excess of at least $10,000 resulting from any 1 accident or event, except when rates therefor are made by a rating organization.

May 20, 1948, 62 Stat. 242, ch. 324, § 2
Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-40, § 14, 40 DCR 6009
1973 Ed., § 35-1502.
1981 Ed., § 35-1702.